src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-moksís_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - moksísa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     moksísa+NA+Sg: moksísa
     moksísa+NA+Pl: moksiiksi
     moksísa+NA+Obv: moksisi
     moksísa+NA+Non: moksisí
     
     moksísa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: noksisa
     moksísa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: noksiiksi
     moksísa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: noksisi
     moksísa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: noksisi
     
     moksísa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: noksiinnaana
     moksísa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: noksiinnaaniksi
     moksísa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: noksiinnaani
     moksísa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: noksiinnaani

     moksísa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: koksiinnoona
     moksísa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: koksiinnooniksi
     moksísa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: koksiinnooni
     moksísa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: koksiinnooni

     moksísa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: koksisa
     moksísa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: koksiiksi
     moksísa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: koksisi
     moksísa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: koksisi

     moksísa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: koksisoaawa
     moksísa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: koksisoaawaiksi
     moksísa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: koksisoaawayi
     moksísa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: koksisoaawai

     moksísa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: oksiiksi
     moksísa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: oksisi
     moksísa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: oksisi

     moksísa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: oksisoaawaiksi
     moksísa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: oksisoaawayi
     moksísa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: oksisoaawai
